Washington statutes.
RCW 18.340.040

Military spouse assistance web pages.

(1) The employment security department, the department of health, the department of licensing, and the department of veterans affairs shall each maintain a military spouse assistance web page containing, at a minimum:

(a) Each authority's rules and procedures, including any required fees, related to the licensing of military spouses;

(b) Contact information for each authority's military spouse contact or coordinator; and

(c) Links to the military spouse assistance web pages of other agencies.

(2) A direct link to the agency's military spouse assistance web page must be displayed on the agency's home page.

[ 2023 c 165 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—Finding—Intent—2023 c 165: See notes following RCW 18.340.020.